New York, session 2025-2026, S8181.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 11 of part B of chapter 104 of the laws of 2005, 2 enacting the September 11th worker protection task force act, as sepa- 3 rately amended by section 1 of item P of subpart B of part XXX of chap- 4 ter 58 and chapter 169 of the laws of 2020, is amended to read as 5 follows: 6 § 11. This act shall take effect September 11, 2005, and shall expire 7 and be deemed repealed on June 10, [2025] 2030. 8 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13109-01-5